Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 2. Witnesses.

Collateral references. —

81 Am. Jur. 2d, Witnesses, § 1 et seq.

98 C.J.S., Witnesses, § 1 et seq.

Conviction in another jurisdiction as disqualifying witness, 2 ALR2d 579.

Right of witness detained in custody for future appearance to fees for such detention, 50 ALR2d 1439.

Prejudicial effect in civil case of communications between witnesses and jurors, 52 ALR2d 182.

Testimony of witness as basis of civil action for damages, 54 ALR2d 1298.

Who is “employee” within statute permitting examination, as adverse witness, of employee of party, 56 ALR2d 1108.

Corporate litigant, allowance, as taxable costs, of witness fees and mileage of stockholder, directors, officers, and employees of, 57 ALR2d 1243.

Comment, in argument of civil case, on adversary’s failure to call employee as witness, 68 ALR2d 1072.

Construction and effect of statutory provision for change of venue for the promotion of the convenience of witnesses and the ends of justice, 74 A.L.R.2d 16.

Privilege of party, witness, or attorney while going to, attending, or returning from court as extending to privilege from arrest for crime, 74 ALR2d 592.

Compelling testimony of opponent’s expert in state court, 77 ALR2d 1182; 66 ALR4th 213.

Illness or death of party, counsel, or witness as excuse for failure to timely prosecute action, 80 ALR2d 1399.

Competency of young child as witness in civil case, 81 ALR2d 386, 60 ALR4th 369.

Coaching of witness by spectator at trial as prejudicial error, 81 ALR2d 1142.

Refreshment of recollection by use of memoranda or other writings, 82 ALR2d 473.

Juror’s relationship to witness in civil case as ground for disqualification or for reversal or new trial, 85 ALR2d 851.

Limiting number of noncharacter witnesses in civil case, 5 ALR3d 169.

Scope and extent, and remedy or sanctions for infringement, of accused’s right to communicate with his attorney, 5 ALR3d 1360.

Social or business relationship between proposed juror and nonparty witness as affecting former’s qualification as juror, 11 ALR3d 859.

Admissibility, in civil case, of expert or opinion evidence as to proposed witness’ inability to testify, 11 ALR3d 1360.

Disclosure of name, identity, address, occupation, or business of client as violation of attorney-client privilege, 16 A.L.R.3d 1047.

Identity of witnesses whom adverse party plans to call to testify at civil trial, as subject of pretrial discovery, 19 ALR3d 1114.

Allowance of mileage or witness fees with respect to witnesses who were not called to testify or not permitted to do so when called, 22 ALR3d 675.

Disqualification of judge on ground of being a witness in the case, 22 ALR3d 1198.

Taking deposition or serving interrogatories in civil case as waiver of incompetency of witness, 23 ALR3d 389.

Validity and construction of state court’s pretrial order precluding publicity or comment about pending case by counsel, parties, or witnesses, 33 ALR3d 1041.

Cross-examination of witness as to his mental state or condition, to impeach competency or credibility, 44 ALR3d 1203.

Modern status of rules regarding use of hypothetical questions in illiciting opinion of expert witness, 56 ALR3d 300.

Use of videotape to take deposition for presentation at civil trial in state court, 66 ALR3d 637.

Statutes excluding testimony of one person because of death of another as applicable to attorneys, 67 ALR3d 924.

Trial jurors as witnesses in same state court or related case, 86 ALR3d 781.

Sufficiency of efforts to procure missing witness’ attendance to justify admission of his former testimony — state cases, 3 ALR4th 87.

Spouse’s betrayal or connivance as extending marital communications privilege to testimony of third person, 3 ALR4th 1104.

Applicability of attorney-client privilege to evidence or testimony in subsequent action, between parties originally represented contemporaneously by same attorney, with reference to communication to or from one party, 4 ALR4th 765.

Admissibility and effect, on issue of party’s credibility or merits of his case, of evidence of attempts to intimidate or influence witness in civil action, 4 ALR4th 829.

Testimonial privilege for confidential communications between relatives other than husband and wife — state cases, 6 ALR4th 528.

Manner or extent of trial judge’s examination of witnesses in civil cases, 6 ALR4th 951.

Validity, construction, and application of state statutes imposing criminal penalties for influencing, intimidating, or tampering with witness, 8 ALR4th 769.

Failure or refusal of insured to attend trial or to testify as breach of cooperation clause, 9 A.L.R.4th 218.

Testimony before or communications to private professional society’s judicial commission, ethics committee, or the like, as privileged, 9 ALR4th 807.

Construction and application, under state law, of doctrine of “executive privilege,” 10 ALR4th 355.

Physician-patient privilege as extending to patient’s medical or hospital records, 10 ALR4th 552.

Admissibility of testimony concerning extrajudicial statements made to, or in presence of, witness through an interpreter, 12 ALR4th 1016.

Existence of spousal privilege where marriage was entered into for purpose of barring testimony, 13 ALR4th 1305.

Applicability of attorney-client privilege to communications made in presence of or solely to or by third person, 14 ALR4th 594.

Closed-circuit television witness examination, 61 ALR4th 1155.

Adverse presumption or inference based on failure to produce or examine codefendant or accomplice who is not on trial — modern criminal cases, 76 ALR4th 812.

Sec. 09.20.110.
Service on concealed witness.

If a witness is concealed in a building or vessel for the purpose of preventing the service of a subpoena, a peace officer may break into the building or vessel to serve the subpoena upon the witness.

History.

(§ 3.01 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For service of subpoena generally, see Civ.
R. 45(c) and (e).

Sec. 09.20.120.
Disobedience to subpoena.

A witness who disobeys a subpoena served on the witness shall also forfeit to the party requiring the attendance of the witness the sum of $50 and all damages which that party may sustain by the failure of the witness to attend.
The forfeiture and damages may be recovered in a civil action.

History.

(§ 3.02 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For contempt for failure to obey subpoena, see Civ.
R. 45(f).

Sec. 09.20.130.
Proceedings for examination of prisoner as a witness.

If a witness is a prisoner confined in a prison in the state, a state court may order the prisoner’s temporary removal and production before a state court for the purpose of being orally examined

by the court or a judge of the court in which the action or proceeding is pending, unless it is a district court;

by a judge of the superior or supreme court when the action or proceeding is pending in a district court, or when the witness’s oral examination is required before a judge or other persons out of court.

In any other case, a state court may order the examination in prison upon a deposition.

History.

(§ 3.03 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966)

Collateral references. —

Propriety and prejudicial effect of witness testifying while in prison attire, 16 ALR4th 1356.

Sec. 09.20.140.
Compelling person to testify.

A person present in court or before a judicial officer may be required to testify in the same manner as if the person were in attendance before the court or officer on a subpoena.

History.

(§ 3.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.20.150.
Witnesses are exonerated from civil arrest.

A person who has been served in good faith with a subpoena to attend as a witness before a court, judge, referee, or other official is exonerated from arrest in a civil action while going to the place of attendance, necessarily remaining there, and returning from there.
The arrest of a witness contrary to this section is void, and when wilfully made is a contempt of court. The officer wilfully making it is responsible to the witness arrested for double the amount of damages that may be assessed against the witness, and is also liable to an action at the suit of the party serving the witness with the subpoena for the damages sustained by the party in consequence of the arrest.

History.

(§ 3.05 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.20.160.
Affidavit as prerequisite to officer’s liability.

The officer making the arrest is not liable in any way therefor unless the person claiming exoneration from arrest, if required, makes an affidavit stating that the person

has been served a subpoena to attend as a witness before a court, judge, referee, or other official, specifying the same, the place of attendance, and the action or proceeding in which the subpoena was issued; and

has not been served by the person’s own procurement with the intention of avoiding an arrest.

The affidavit may be taken by the officer, and exonerates the officer from liability for not making the arrest or for discharging the witness when arrested.

History.

(§ 3.06 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.20.170.
Discharge from improper arrest.

The court, judge, referee, or other person before whom the attendance of the witness is required may discharge a witness from an arrest made in violation of AS

09.20.150

.

History.

(§ 3.07 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.20.180.
Exclusion of witnesses from courtroom.

Except as provided in AS

12.61.010

and AS

47.12.110(b)

, upon the request of either party the judge may exclude from the courtroom any witness of the adverse party not under examination at the time so that the witness may not hear the testimony of other witnesses.

History.

(§ 3.08 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 63 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For related provision, see Evid.
R. 615.

For legislative purpose concerning the amendment to this section made by § 2, ch. 63, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 63, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 27(a), ch. 63, SLA 1997 provides that “this Act applies to a criminal or juvenile hearing and proceedings” held on or after July 1, 1997, “regardless of whether the criminal offense or delinquent act occurred before, on, or after” July 1, 1997.

Sec. 09.20.185.
Expert witness qualification.

In an action based on professional negligence, a person may not testify as an expert witness on the issue of the appropriate standard of care unless the witness is

a professional who is licensed in this state or in another state or country;

trained and experienced in the same discipline or school of practice as the defendant or in an area directly related to a matter at issue; and

certified by a board recognized by the state as having acknowledged expertise and training directly related to the particular field or matter at issue.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply if the state has not recognized a board that has certified the witness in the particular field or matter at issue.

History.

(§ 15 ch 26 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to the effect of 1997 enactment of this section on Rule 702, Alaska Rules of Evidence, see § 51, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts. For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.
For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”